apertium-oci.oci.metadix
<!-- com dorm/èrem (d/ormir) però amb el ppi en -èrt a la varietat oc (el seu equivalent oc@aran és dorm/èrem) -->
        <pardef n="dub/èrt__vblex">        
      <e><p><l>rint</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rint</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>risquen</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>risquen</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantant"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>risque</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>risque</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cante"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>rir</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rir</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
      <e r="LR"><p><l>rí</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantar"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>èrtas</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>èrta</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>èrts</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>èrt</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ririam</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ririái</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ririatz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ririás</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ririán</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>ririá</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rirem</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rirai</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riretz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riràs</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riràn</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rirà</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rèrem</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riguèri</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riguèretz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riguères</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riguèron</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riguèt</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riscam</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riscam</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissètz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissètz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantem"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>rís</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rís</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__sigues"/></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissiam</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissiái</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissiatz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissiás</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissián</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissiá</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riguèssem</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>riguèsse</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>riguèssetz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>riguèsses</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>riguèsson</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>riguèsse</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissèm</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissi</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rissètz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>risses</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>risson</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>rís</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>                
      <e><p><l>riscam</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>risca</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riscatz</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riscas</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>riscan</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>        
      <e><p><l>risca</l><r>rir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>        
    </pardef>

      <e r="LR" lm="recobrir" alt="oci@aran"><i>recob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="recobrir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>recob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="recobrir" alt="oci"><i>recob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="dobrir" alt="oci@aran"><i>dob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="dobrir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>dob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dobrir" alt="oci"><i>dob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="dubrir" r="LR"><i>dub</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="obrir" r="LR"><i>ob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="cobrir" alt="oci@aran"><i>cob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="cobrir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>cob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="cobrir" alt="oci"><i>cob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="descobrir" alt="oci@aran"><i>descob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="descobrir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>descob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="descobrir" alt="oci"><i>descob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="encobrir" alt="oci@aran"><i>encob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="encobrir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>encob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="encobrir" alt="oci"><i>encob</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="sofrir" alt="oci@aran"><i>sof</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
      <e r="LR" lm="sofrir" alt="oci@gascon"><i>sof</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="sofrir" alt="oci"><i>sof</i><par n="dub/èrt__vblex"/></e>
